test/src/morphology/N-laeqbdi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - läʼbḑi: # Noun 190 'eng /est labidas/fin' - full paradigm
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Nom: läʼbḑi
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Gen: läʼbḑiz
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Par: läʼbḑizt
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Dat: läʼbḑin
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Ins: läʼbḑiks
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Ill: läʼbḑizõ
     läʼbḑi+N+Sg+Ela: läʼbḑist
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Nom: läʼbḑid
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Gen: läʼbḑid
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Par: läʼbḑidi
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Dat: läʼbḑidõn
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Ins: läʼbḑidõks
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Ill: läʼbḑiž
     läʼbḑi+N+Pl+Ela: läʼbḑisti
